Hawaii statutes.
[§480E-9.5] Recordkeeping and compliance
requirements. (a) Any distressed property consultant shall keep, for a
period of twenty-four months from the date the record is created, the following
records:

(1) All contracts or other agreements between the distressed
property consultant and any consumer for any mortgage assistance relief
service;

(2) Copies of all written communications between the
distressed property consultant and the distressed property owner or owners
occurring prior to the date on which the property owner or owners entered into
an agreement with the distressed property consultant for any mortgage
assistance relief service;

(3) Copies of all documents or telephone recordings
created in connection with compliance with subsection (b);

(4) All files containing the distressed property
owner's or owners' names and phone numbers, dollar amounts paid, and
descriptions of mortgage assistance relief services purchased, to the extent
the distressed property consultant keeps such information in the ordinary
course of business;

(5) Copies of all materially different sales scripts,
training materials, commercial communications, or other marketing materials,
including websites and weblogs, for any mortgage assistance relief service; and

(6) Copies of the documentation provided to the
consumer as specified in section 480E-3.

(b) A distressed property consultant shall
also:

(1) Take reasonable steps sufficient to monitor and
ensure that all employees and independent contractors comply with this chapter.
Such steps shall include the monitoring of communications directed at specific
consumers and shall also include, at a minimum, the following:

(A) If the distressed property consultant is
engaged in the telemarketing of mortgage assistance relief services, performing
random, blind recording and testing of the oral representations made by
individuals engaged in sales or other customer service functions;

(B) Establishing a procedure for receiving
and responding to any and all complaints regarding or relating to the
distressed property consultant or mortgage assistance relief service, or both;
and

(C) Ascertaining the number and nature of any
complaints regarding transactions in which any employee or independent
contractor, or both, is involved;

(2) Investigate promptly and fully each consumer
complaint received;

(3) Take corrective action with respect to any
employee or independent contractor whom the distressed property consultant
determines is not complying with this chapter, which action may include
training, disciplining, or terminating the individual; and

(4) Maintain any information and material necessary
to demonstrate the distressed property consultant's compliance with this
subsection.

(c) A distressed property consultant may keep
the records required by this section in any form, and in the same manner,
format, or place as it keeps such records in the ordinary course of business.
[L 2016, c 142, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next